Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
Chapter 5. Juries
§ 13-5-67.
Impaneling of alternate jurors.

Except in cases in which jury selection and selection of alternate jurors is governed by rules promulgated by the Mississippi Supreme Court, whenever, in the opinion of a circuit judge or chancellor presiding in a case in which a jury is to be used, the trial is likely to be a protracted one, such circuit judge or chancellor, in his discretion, may direct that one (1) or two (2) jurors in addition to the regular panel be called and impaneled to sit as alternate jurors. Alternate jurors in the order in which they are called shall replace jurors who, prior to the time the jury retires to consider its verdict, become unable or disqualified to perform their duties. Alternate jurors shall be drawn in the same manner, shall have the same qualifications, shall be subject to the same examination and challenges for cause, shall take the same oath and shall have the same functions, powers, facilities and privileges as the regular jurors. An alternate juror who does not replace a regular juror shall be discharged at the time the jury retires to consider its verdict. In capital cases the defendant and the state shall each be allowed two (2) peremptory challenges to alternate jurors in addition to those otherwise provided by law. In all other cases each party shall be allowed one (1) peremptory challenge to alternate jurors in addition to those otherwise provided by law. In any criminal case all peremptory challenges by the state shall be made before the alternate juror is presented to the defendant. The additional peremptory challenges provided for herein may be used against an alternate juror only, and other peremptory challenges allowed by law may not be used against an alternate juror.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1792.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 241, §§ 1, 2 [¶¶ 1-2]; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 103, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-5-69.
Examination of jurors by attorneys or litigants.

Except in cases in which the examination of jurors is governed by rules promulgated by the Mississippi Supreme Court, the parties or their attorneys in all jury trials shall have the right to question jurors who are being impaneled with reference to challenges for cause, and for peremptory challenges, and it shall not be necessary to propound the questions through the presiding judge, but they may be asked by the attorneys or by litigants not represented by attorneys.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2068; 1942, § 1802; Laws, 1922, ch. 294; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 104, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-5-71.
Oath of petit jurors.

Petit jurors shall be sworn in the following form:

“You, and each of you, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that you will well and truly try all issues and execute all writs of inquiry that may be submitted to you, or left to your decision by the court, during the present term, and true verdicts give according to the evidence. So help you God.”

The oath shall authorize the jury to try all issues and execute all writs of inquiry which may be submitted to it during that term of the court. Talesmen, if any be summoned or retained, shall in like manner be sworn to try all issues and execute all writs of inquiry which may be submitted to them during the day for which they are summoned or the time for which they are retained.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 1 (132); 1857, ch. 61, art. 143; 1871, § 744; 1880, § 1697; 1892, § 2384; 1906, § 2713; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2206; 1930, § 2059; 1942, § 1793.

§ 13-5-73.
Oath of jurors and bailiffs in capital cases.

The jurors in a capital case shall be sworn to “well and truly try the issue between the state and the prisoner, and a true verdict give according to the evidence and the law.” Bailiffs may be specially sworn by the court, or under its direction, to attend on such jury and perform such duties as the court may prescribe for them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3060; 1892, § 1410; 1906, § 1483; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1241; 1930, § 1264; 1942, § 2507.

§ 13-5-75.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11.

[Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 10 (2); 1857, ch. 61, art. 141; 1871, § 742; 1880, § 1693; 1892, § 2385; 1906, § 2714; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2207; 1930, § 2060; 1942, § 1794; Laws, 1938, ch. 304]

§ 13-5-77.
Special venire facias to issue in certain criminal cases.

When any person charged with a capital crime, or with the crime of manslaughter, shall have been arraigned and the plea of not guilty entered, the accused or the district attorney in any such case shall, upon demand, be entitled to a special venire. If at a term of court a special venire has been demanded for any case or cases, it shall be the duty of the court to cause to be drawn, in open court, from the jury box as many names as the judge in his discretion may direct, not to be less than forty (40) for each special venire as the judge in his discretion may direct to be called, and it shall be the duty of the clerk to issue a special venire facias, commanding the sheriff to summon the persons whose names are so drawn, to attend the court on a particular day to be named in the writ. It shall not be necessary that a separate special venire be drawn for each case in which a special venire is demanded. Those persons summoned pursuant to the issuance of a special venire facias shall attend the court on the day named in the writ and shall serve as the court may direct on any case for which a special venire has been demanded; provided, however, no juror summoned as a special venireman shall be impaneled or serve on more than one (1) case. In the event a special venire be exhausted in a case without a jury being impaneled from those summoned and in attendance, the court shall proceed to make up the jury for the trial of the case from the regular panel and tales jurors who may have been summoned for the day. If, after exhausting said regular panel and tales jurors, a competent jury be not obtained, the court shall direct the sheriff to summon forthwith as many tales jurors as shall be sufficient to complete the jury.

In the event that there should be no such box, or the same should be mislaid, or the names therein have been exhausted, then the court may order a special venire facias to be issued by the clerk, directing the sheriff to summon as many jurors as may be necessary, not less than forty (40) for each special venire as the judge in his discretion may direct to be called and, after exhausting a special venire in any case, to impanel the jury as hereinbefore directed. The slips containing the names of all jurors drawn or summoned on a special venire, and not impaneled on a jury, shall be returned to the box from which they were drawn immediately after a jury shall be impaneled. If a special venire be not demanded, the jury in each case shall be composed of the regular venire for the week and as many talesmen and bystanders as may be required, to be summoned under the order of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 65, art. 7 (1); 1857, ch. 64, art. 295; 1871, § 2759; 1880, § 3058; 1892, § 2386; 1906, § 2715; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2208; 1930, § 2061; 1942, § 1795; Laws, 1985, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 13-5-79.
When opinion as to guilt or innocence will not render one incompetent in a criminal case.

Any person, otherwise competent, who will make oath that he is impartial in the case, shall be competent as a juror in any criminal case, notwithstanding the fact that he has an impression or an opinion as to the guilt or innocence of the accused, if it appear to the satisfaction of the court that he has no bias or feeling or prejudice in the case, and no desire to reach any result in it, except that to which the evidence may conduct. Any juror shall be excluded, however, if the court be of opinion that he cannot try the case impartially, and the exclusion shall not be assignable for error.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3072; 1892, § 2355; 1906, § 2685; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2177; 1930, § 2030; 1942, § 1763.

§ 13-5-81.
Challenge to array; quashing of venire.

A challenge to the array shall not be sustained, except for fraud, nor shall any venire facias, except a special venire facias in a criminal case, be quashed for any cause whatever.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 10 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 142; 1871, § 743; 1880, § 1694; 1892, § 2387; 1906, § 2716; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2209; 1930, § 2062; 1942, § 1796.

§ 13-5-83.
Intoxicated jurors; jurors under the control of the court.

If any juror summoned to appear at court, should render himself unfit for service by intoxication before his name is called in court, he shall be fined in a sum not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and be imprisoned for a term not exceeding twenty-four hours. After grand and petit jurors are impaneled they shall be under the control of the court, and, for any breach of duty or contempt of court, may be fined and imprisoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 752; 1880, § 1696; 1892, § 2388; 1906, § 2717; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2210; 1930, § 2063; 1942, § 1797.

§ 13-5-85.
Selection of and service on juries in Harrison County.

In Harrison County, a county having two judicial districts, the law in relation to the selection and liability to jury service of grand and petit juries shall be applicable to each of the two judicial districts of the county in the same manner as if each district were a separate county, so far as the same may be made to apply. No person shall be made to serve as a grand or petit juror except in the district in which he resides. Lists of persons subject and liable to jury duty shall be made and grand and petit jurors shall be selected and empaneled in each of said districts in the same manner as if each were a separate county, except in such cases where it is otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 8, eff. from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 13-5-87.
Laws as to listing, drawing, summoning and impaneling of juries are directory.

All the provisions of law in relation to the listing, drawing, summoning and impaneling juries are directory merely, and a jury listed, drawn, summoned or impaneled, though in an informal or irregular manner, shall be deemed a legal jury after it shall have been impaneled and sworn, and it shall have the power to perform all the duties devolving on the jury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art. 250; 1871, § 2843; 1880, § 1672; 1892, § 2389; 1906, § 2718; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2211; 1930, § 2064; 1942, § 1798.

§ 13-5-89.
Juries in condemnation proceedings.

In all cases where a jury is required in the exercise of the right of eminent domain, the sheriff and clerks of the circuit and chancery courts shall draw eighteen names from the jury box, and the slips containing the names shall be returned to the box. The sheriff shall summon the jury thus drawn, and the jurors shall attend, under the same penalties as in the circuit court, and the penalties may be enforced therein at the next term, on complaint of the proper party or of the sheriff.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2390; 1906, § 2719; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2212; 1930, § 2065; 1942, § 1799.

§ 13-5-91.
Jury may view the place.

When, in the opinion of the court, on the trial of any cause, civil or criminal, it is proper, in order to reach the ends of justice, for the court and jury to have a view or inspection of the property which is the subject of litigation, or the place at which the offense is charged to have been committed, or the place or places at which any material fact occurred, or of any material object or thing in any way connected with the evidence in the case, the court may, at its discretion, enter an order providing for such view or inspection as is herein below directed. After such order is entered, the whole organized court, consisting of the judge, jury, clerk, sheriff, and the necessary number of deputy sheriffs, shall proceed, in a body, to such place or places, property, object or thing to be so viewed or inspected, which shall be pointed out and explained to the court and jury by the witnesses in the case, who may, at the discretion of the court, be questioned by the court and by the representative of each side at the time and place of such view or inspection, in reference to any material fact brought out by such view or inspection. The court on such occasion shall remain in session from the time it leaves the courtroom till it returns thereto, and while so in session outside the courtroom it shall have full power to compel the attendance of witnesses, to preserve order, to prevent disturbance and to punish for contempt such as it has when sitting in the courtroom. In criminal trials all such views or inspections must be had before the whole court and in the presence of the accused, and the production of all evidence from all witnesses or objects, animate or inanimate, must be in his presence.

HISTORY:
Codes 1892, § 2391; 1906, § 2720; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2213; 1930, § 2066; 1942, § 1800.

§ 13-5-93.
Nine jurors may return a verdict in civil cases.

In the trial of all civil suits in the circuit or chancery courts of this state, nine or more jurors may agree on the verdict and return it into court as the verdict of the jury. Either party may request an instruction in writing to this effect and it shall thereupon be the duty of the trial judge to instruct the jury in writing that if nine or more jurors agree on the verdict that they may return the same into open court as the verdict of the jury.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 2214; 1930, § 2067; 1942, § 1801; Laws, 1916, ch. 162.

§ 13-5-95.
Separate accommodations and bailiffs for male and female jurors.

In selecting overnight accommodations for jurors, the court shall provide separate housing for men and women jurors. Male bailiffs shall accompany the male jurors, and female bailiffs the female jurors. At least one bailiff shall accompany each group, and the court in its sound discretion shall require as many bailiffs as are necessary. Either group may be housed in private premises if necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1762-07; Laws, 1968, ch. 337, § 1, eff. from and after passage (approved July 9, 1968).

§ 13-5-97.
Certain jury records exempt from public access requirements.

Records in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, which are developed among juries concerning judicial decisions, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 11.